src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-4lex_4uhcad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../..//generator-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:  

  Verb - posâluhčâđ: #     
    posâluhčâđ+V+Inf: [posâluhčâđ, posâlâhčâđ]
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: posâluuvčâm
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: posâluuvčah
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [posâluš, posâlâš]
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: posâluhčeen
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: posâlušvettee
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: posâluhčâv
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: posâluhčâp
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: posâlušvetteđ
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: posâluhčeh
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: posâluhčim
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: posâluhčih
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: posâluuvčâi
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: posâluvččáim
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: posâluvččáid
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: posâluvččáin
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: posâluuvčâim
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: posâluuvčâid
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: posâluhčii
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: posâluš
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: posâluhčim
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: posâluuvčâi
    posâluhčâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: posâluhčii
    posâluhčâđ+V+PrfPrc: posâluhčâm
    posâluhčâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: posâluhčum
